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DTC P0973/62 Shift Solenoid ”A” Control Circuit Low
(ShiftSolenoidValveS 1)

DTC P0974/62 Shift Solenoid ”A” Control Circuit High
(ShiftSolenoidValveS 1)

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
See page DI−49.

DTC No. DTC Detection Condition Trouble Area

P0973/62
EngineandECTECUdetectsshort insolenoidvalveS1circuit
4 timeswhensolenoidvalveS1 isoperated (1 −tripdetection
logic)

SShort inshift solenoidvalveS1circuit
SShift solenoidvalveS1

SEngineandECTECU

P0974/62
EngineandECTECUdetectsopen insolenoidvalveS1circuit
4 timeswhensolenoidvalveS1 isnotoperated (1 −tripdetec-
tion logic)

SOpen inshift solenoidvalveS1circuit
SShift solenoidvalveS1

SEngineandECTECU
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Check transmission wire.

PREPARATION:
Disconnect the transmission wire connector.
CHECK:
Measure resistance between S1 of transmission wire connec-
tor and body ground.
OK:

Resistance: 11 − 1 5 � at 20˚ C (68˚ F)

NG Go to step 3.

OK

2 Measure resistance between terminal S1 and E1 of Engine and ECT ECU connec-
tor.

PREPARATION:
(a) Connect the transmission wire connector.
(b) Disconnect the connector of the Engine and ECT ECU.
CHECK:
Measure resistance between terminals S1 and E1 of Engine
and ECT ECU connector.
OK:

Resistance: 11 − 1 5 � at 20˚ C (68˚ F)

NG Repair or replace the harness or connector
(See page IN−38).

OK

Check and replace the Engine and ECT ECU
(See page IN−38).
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3 Check shift solenoid valve S1.

PREPARATION:
(a) Jack up the vehicle.
(b) Remove the oil pan.
(c) Remove the shift solenoid valve S1.
CHECK:
Measure the resistance between the solenoid connector termi-
nal and the body ground.
OK:

Resistance: 11 − 1 5 � at 20˚ C (68˚ F)
CHECK:
Connect the battery positive lead to the solenoid connector ter-
m inal and t he bat t er y negat ive lead t o t he s olenoid body
ground.
OK:

Solenoid sounds operation noise.

NG Replace the shift solenoid valve S1
(See page AT−8) .

OK

Repair or replace the transmission wire
(See page AT−6) .


